Ohio, session 136, HB861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3902.65 and 5164.18 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3902.65. A health benefit plan shall not deny a claim of reimbursement for dental services on the sole basis of the age of the recipient of those services. Sec. 5164.18. The department of medicaid shall not deny a claim for reimbursement for dental services provided under the medicaid program by a medicaid provider on the sole basis of the age of the recipient of those services.